Utah statutes.
65A-8a-103.   Registration of operators.
(1)  An operator intending to conduct forest practices in Utah, except a
landowner conducting forest practices on the landowner's own land, shall
register with the division.
(2)  The operator shall submit the following information to the division:
(a)  the name of the company;
(b)  the name of the state where the company is incorporated; and
(c)  the name, telephone number, and address of a company officer and an on-
the-ground supervisor.
(3)  In consultation with industry representatives, the division may
establish, by rule, minimum requirements for registration of operators in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(4)  The division shall make available to landowners a list of registered
operators.
